Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 67 Sports Authorities Act of 1993
7-67-116. Powers of municipalities to aid or assist authorities.

Except as may be expressly prohibited by this section, any municipality is authorized to aid or otherwise provide assistance to an authority created pursuant to this chapter by such municipality, including entering into leases of projects, or parts of projects with an authority, for such term or terms and upon such conditions as may be determined by the governing body of such municipality, notwithstanding and without regard to the restrictions, prohibitions, or requirements of any other law, whether public or private, or granting, contributing or pledging revenues of the municipality to or for the benefit of the authority derived from any source, except revenues derived from ad valorem property taxes that shall not be granted, contributed or pledged by the municipality in payment of or collateral for any revenue bonds of the authority.

In addition to the powers granted in this chapter, any metropolitan government or legislative bodies of municipalities, acting jointly, in any county having a population in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, is authorized to aid or otherwise provide assistance to an authority created pursuant to the provisions of this chapter by such metropolitan government or municipalities, acting jointly, in any county having a population in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, by entering into contracts with any other party in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter, for such term or terms and upon such conditions as may be determined by the governing body of such metropolitan government or legislative bodies of municipalities, acting jointly, in any county having a population in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1993, ch. 378, § 16; 1995, ch. 414, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

7-67-117. Execution of leases, contracts, deeds.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all leases, contracts, deeds of conveyance, or instruments in writing executed by the authority, shall be executed in the name of the authority by the chair or secretary of the authority, or by such other officers as the board of directors, by resolution, may direct, and the seal of the authority may be affixed to such instruments.

Acts 1993, ch. 378, § 17.

7-67-118. Nonprofit corporation — Disposition of earnings.

The authority shall be a public nonprofit corporation and no part of its net earnings remaining after payment of its expenses shall inure to the benefit of any individual, firm or corporation, except that in the event the board of directors shall determine that sufficient provision has been made for the full payment of the expenses, bonds and other obligations of the authority, including reserves for the expenses, bonds and other obligations, any net earnings of the authority thereafter accruing may be used to provide a reserve for depreciation of any project or projects undertaken by such authority, in an amount determined by the board of directors to be necessary and reasonable, and net earnings available thereafter shall be paid to the municipality with respect to which the authority was organized; provided, that nothing contained in this section shall prevent the board of directors from transferring all or any part of its properties in accordance with the terms of any lease entered into by the authority.

Acts 1993, ch. 378, § 18.

7-67-119. Completion of corporate purpose — Dissolution.

Whenever the board of directors of an authority or the governing body of the creating municipality by resolution determines that the purposes for which the authority was formed have been substantially accomplished and all bonds theretofore issued and all obligations theretofore incurred by the authority have been fully paid, the members of the board of directors or the executive officers of the municipality, as the case may be, shall thereupon execute and file for record in the office of the secretary of state a certificate of dissolution, reciting such facts and declaring the authority to be dissolved. Such certificate of dissolution shall be executed under the seal of the authority. Upon the filing of such certificate of dissolution, the authority shall stand dissolved, the title to all funds and properties owned by it at the time of such dissolution shall vest in the municipality with respect to which the authority was organized, and possession of such funds and properties shall forthwith be delivered to such municipality.

Acts 1993, ch. 378, § 19.

Attorney General Opinions. Methods for dissolution of county sports authority, OAG 96-128, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 156 (11/12/96).

7-67-120. Joint operation.

The powers conferred upon authorities created under this chapter may be exercised by two (2) or more such authorities acting jointly.

Two (2) or more municipalities may, by acting jointly, incorporate a sports authority to effectuate the purposes of this chapter. When two (2) or more municipalities incorporate such an authority, each and every requisite pertaining to the application for incorporation, qualification of applicants, charter and amendment of charter shall, as nearly as may be practicable, be incumbent in like manner upon each municipality joining in the creation of such authority.

Acts 1993, ch. 378, § 20.

7-67-121. Project sites.

Any municipality may acquire a project site by gift, purchase or lease, or exercise of the power of eminent domain, and may transfer any project site to an authority by sale, lease or gift. Such transfer may be authorized by a resolution of the governing body of the municipality without submission of the question to the voters, and without regard to the requirements, restrictions, limitations or other provisions contained in any other general, special or local law.

Acts 1993, ch. 378, § 21.

7-67-122. Powers not restricted — Law complete in itself.

This chapter shall not be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any powers that an authority, as a public corporation, might otherwise have under any laws of this state, but shall be construed as cumulative of any such powers. No proceedings, notice or approval shall be required for the organization of the authority or the issuance of any bonds or any instrument as security for the bonds, except as provided in this chapter, any other law to the contrary notwithstanding; provided, that nothing in this chapter shall be construed to deprive the state and its governmental subdivisions of their respective police powers over properties of the authority, or to impair any power over properties of the authority of any official or agency of the state and its governmental subdivisions that may be otherwise provided by law. Projects may be acquired, purchased, constructed, reconstructed, improved, bettered and extended, and bonds may be issued under this chapter for such purposes, notwithstanding that any other general, special or local law may provide for the acquisition, purchase, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment and extension of a like project, or the issuance of bonds for like purposes, and without regard to the requirements, restrictions, limitations or other provisions contained in any other general, special or local law.

Acts 1993, ch. 378, § 22.